District of Columbia statutes.
47-871

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Condominium”, “cooperative housing association”, “dwelling unit”, or “nontransient” shall have the same meaning as the terms have in § 47-813(d); and

(2)

“Homeowners association” means a mandatory membership association of owners of residential real property created and formed pursuant to a recorded instrument including a declaration of covenants, limitations, and conditions, which subjects property within the homeowners association to certain restrictive covenants.

Oct. 2, 1990, D.C. Law 8-180, § 2, 37 DCR 5039
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-871.